test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k19_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    meldur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: meldur
    meldur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: meldur
    meldur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: meldri
    meldur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: meldurs
    meldur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: meldrar
    meldur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: meldrar
    meldur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: meldrum
    meldur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: meldra
    meldur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: meldurin
    meldur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: meldurin
    meldur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: meldrinum
    meldur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: meldursins
    meldur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: meldrarnir
    meldur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: meldrarnar
    meldur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: meldrunum
    meldur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: meldranna
